Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; METRO TRANSIT POLICE.new text end new text begin $7,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $7,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for staff and equipment costs of additional sworn officers for the Metro Transit Police Department. new text end